Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-2212
Motor vehicle parking; rules and regulations; enforcement.

To promote the public safety and welfare, the State Building Administrator, in consultation with the State Capitol Administrator, shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations governing motor vehicle parking on the approaches to the State Capitol. Such rules and regulations may limit, restrict, or prohibit parking thereon. Notwithstanding the provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act, such rules and regulations shall become effective upon posting notice of the same on or about the premises to be regulated. If any vehicle is found upon any regulated premises in violation of this section, or the rules and regulations adopted pursuant thereto, and the driver cannot be determined, the owner or person in whose name such vehicle is registered shall be held responsible for such violation.

Laws 2004, LB 439, § 12.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.